Arkansas, session 2025, HB1864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-106 is amended to read as follows:
6-10-106. Uniform dates for beginning and end of school year —
Definition School calendar — Definitions.
(a)(1)(A) Each school year, each public school district board of
directors and governing entity of an open-enrollment public charter school
shall establish by policy the first day of the school year for student
attendance in public elementary and secondary schools.
(B) The first day of the school year for student
attendance established under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall
ensure compliance with the number of student teacher interaction days or
hours required by the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools
and School Districts established by the State Board of Education.
(2) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the first day of
*TNL134*
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
the school year for student attendance in public school districts and open-
enrollment pubic charter schools shall be on or after July 1.
(3) The last day of the school year for student attendance in
public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools shall not
be after June 30.
(2)(4) Labor Day shall be celebrated as a school holiday in all
the public school districts of the state and open-enrollment public charter
schools, and school shall not be held on that date.
(3) As used in this section, “week” means a seven-day period
that begins on a Sunday and ends on a Saturday.
(b) Contracts of employment for employees in licensed personnel
positions and employees in nonlicensed personnel positions of public school
districts may require public school district employees to begin performance
under their contract of employment before the first day of student
attendance.
(c)(1) If the school year in any public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school extends beyond the date observed as Memorial
Day, such date shall be a holiday in the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school.
(2) Provided, upon approval of the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education, this date may be used as a make-up day in any school
district which has unavoidably lost more than five (5) scheduled days of
student attendance during the course of the school year due to contagious
disease outbreaks, inclement weather, or other acts of God.
(d)(1) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school that provides a week-long holiday for spring break shall schedule the
spring break holiday for five (5) consecutive school days beginning on the
Monday of the thirty-eighth week of the school year.
(2) The thirty-eighth week of the school year shall be
calculated by counting as week one the first week in July that begins on a
Sunday.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a public school
district or an open-enrollment public charter school from providing fewer
than five (5) consecutive school days for the spring break holiday to comply
with the division's Division of Elementary and Secondary Education's
requirement for a minimum number of days for student attendance under the
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts.
(e) The division State Board of Education shall not grant a waiver
from the requirements of this section unless this section specifically
authorizes the waiver.
(f) Except as provided under subsection (g) of this section, a school
district shall adopt an academic calendar that includes five (5) make-up
days, in addition to the number of student-teacher interaction days required
by the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School
Districts established by the state board, for days unavoidably lost due to
exceptional or emergency circumstances resulting from a contagious disease
outbreak, inclement weather, or other acts of God.
(g)(1) Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, a public school
district board of directors may elect to implement an alternate school
calendar.
(2)(A) An alternate school calendar implemented under
subdivision (g)(1) of this section shall consist of:
(i) At least one thousand sixty-eight (1,068) hours
of instructional time; and
(ii)(a) At least thirty (30) make-up hours, in
addition to the number of hours required of instructional time, for days
unavoidably lost due to exceptional or emergency circumstances resulting from
inclement weather.
(b) If additional make-up hours are needed,
the public school district board of directors shall modify its alternate
school calendar to include make-up hours for the additional hours needed.
(B) However, there shall not be a minimum number of school
days required to meet the required one thousand sixty-eight (1,068) hours of
instructional time.
(3)(A) A public school district board of directors that elects
to implement an alternate school calendar under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section shall:
(i) Notify the division by July 1 of each year that
the public school district intends to implement the alternate school
calendar;
(ii) Post the alternate school calendar on the
public school district's website by August 1 of each year that the public
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
school district intends to implement the alternate school calendar; and
(iii) Input into eSchool, eFinance, or the Arkansas
Public School Computer Network all data that:
(a) Affects the average daily membership of
the public school district; and
(b) Ensures compliance with the required
minimum number of school instructional hours under subdivision (g)(2)(A)(i)
of this section.
(B) A public school district that implements an alternate
school calendar under subdivision (g)(1) of this section may submit an
application to operate a virtual learning option.
(4) The total number of instructional hours under an alternate
school calendar shall be converted to school days for purposes of the:
(A) Number of days required in a teacher employment basic
contract under § 6-17-2402(1);
(B) Number of days counted during the official reporting
period for attendance under § 6-18-213(b)(1); and
(C) Average daily membership calculated under § 6-20-
2303(3).
(5) The division may promulgate rules as necessary to administer
this section.
(f) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school
district board of directors and open-enrollment public charter school
governing body shall adopt a school calendar that includes:
(1) On-site, in-person instruction for a minimum of the
following:
(A) One hundred sixty (160) school days or the hourly
equivalent of one hundred sixty (160) school days for a public school with an
"A" school rating according to the most recent results of the school rating
system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other division-approved
accountability system;
(B) One hundred sixty-four (164) school days or the hourly
equivalent of one hundred sixty-four (164) school days for a public school
with a "B" school rating according to the most recent results of the school
rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other division-approved
accountability system;
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
(C) One hundred sixty-eight (168) school days or the
hourly equivalent of one hundred sixty-eight (168) school days for a public
school with a "C" school rating according to the most recent results of the
school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other division-approved
accountability system;
(D) One hundred seventy-two (172) school days or the
hourly equivalent of one hundred seventy-two (172) school days for a public
school with a "D" school rating according to the most recent results of the
school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other division-approved
accountability system; and
(E) One hundred seventy-eight (178) school days or the
hourly equivalent of one hundred seventy-eight (178) for a public school with
an "F" school rating according to the most recent results of the school
rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other division-approved
accountability system;
(2) A minimum of one hundred ninety (190) teacher contract days;
and
(3) At least thirty (30) make-up instructional hours in addition
to the number of on-site, in-person instruction time required under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section, which shall be used to make up school
days missed due to exceptional or emergency circumstances resulting from:
(A) A contagious disease outbreak;
(B) Inclement weather;
(C) A utility outage;
(D) A reasonable and substantial threat to the safety and
security of the public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school; or
(E) Other acts of God.
(g)(1) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall remain open for on-site, in-person instruction for the minimum
number of days required for the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school as provided under subdivision (f)(1) of this section,
unless the public school district or open-enrollment public charter school is
closed for a reason under subdivision (f)(3) of this section.
(2) The requirement that a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school be open for on-site, in-person instruction
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
under subdivision (g)(1) of this section does not apply to an approved
virtual school.
(h)(1) A public school district superintendent or director of an open-
enrollment public charter school may close school, delay the school day start
time, or release students early during a regularly scheduled school day due
to exceptional or emergency circumstances resulting from:
(A) A contagious disease outbreak;
(B) Inclement weather;
(C) A utility outage;
(D) A reasonable and substantial threat to the safety and
security of the public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school; or
(E) Other acts of God.
(2) If a public school district superintendent or director of an
open-enrollment public charter school closes school, delays the school day
start time, or releases students early during a regularly scheduled school
day under subdivision (h)(1) of this section, then the public school district
or open-enrollment public charter school shall make up the missed
instructional time in order to meet the on-site, in-person instruction time
requirements under subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this section by:
(A) Utilizing the thirty (30) make-up instructional hours
built into the school calendar as required under subdivision (f)(3) of this
section; or
(B) Otherwise modifying the school calendar to include
make-up instructional time for the additional instructional time that is
needed.
(i)(1) For purposes of a school day, at least forty (40) minutes of
instructional time per school day shall be used for recess during the school
day for students attending public elementary schools.
(2) Recess shall:
(A) Consist of supervised social time during which public
school students may communicate with each other;
(B) Occur outdoors when weather and other relevant
conditions permit; and
(C) Include without limitation opportunities for free play
and vigorous physical activity, regardless of whether recess occurs indoors
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
or outdoors.
(3) A public elementary school principal may adjust recess time
required under this subsection (i) due to special circumstances or programs
that interrupt a regular school day.
(4) A public elementary school may seek approval from the
division to provide recess in an alternative method by submitting a request
to the division.
(j) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall:
(1) Post the school calendar on the website of the public school
district or open-enrollment public charter school by July 1 each year; and
(2) Provide to the division, in the format prescribed by the
division, all data that:
(A) Affects the average daily membership of the public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school; and
(B) Ensures compliance with this section.
(k) The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.
(l) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "School day" means a day on which classes are in session
and students are on-site, in-person, and receiving instruction at a public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school.
(B)(i) Any day during which less than six (6) hours of
instructional time are provided to students shall be counted as one-half
(1/2) of a school day if at least three (3) hours of instructional time are
provided to students.
(ii) A day in which less than three (3) hours of
instructional time are provided to students shall not be counted as any part
of a school day; and
(2) "Week" means a seven-day period that begins on a Sunday and
ends on a Saturday.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-10-108 is amended to read as follows:
6-10-108. Twelve-month school year — Definition.
(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that public
school facilities in the state are now effectively utilized only nine (9) or
ten (10) months each year and that such facilities could be more efficiently
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
utilized and educational opportunities in the various school districts could
be enhanced by the establishment and operation of educational programs on a
twelve (12) month per year basis. It is therefore the intent and purpose of
this section to authorize public schools to initiate and maintain public
school educational programs on a twelve-month basis.
(b) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires,
“twelve-month year-round educational program” means an educational program in
which all students attend school no less than the number of days required by
the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School
Districts between July 1 and June 30 of each school year and in which no
vacation, including summer, lasts more than seven (7) weeks.
(c)(1) The board of directors of any school district is authorized to
initiate and maintain a twelve-month year-round educational program in any or
all of the public schools in the school district.
(2) However, any school district which does not elect to operate
on a twelve-month basis must start school in accordance with the provisions
of § 6-10-106.
(d)(1)(a) The State Board of Education is authorized to may establish
appropriate standards, guidelines, and rules for the determination of average
daily membership of public school districts and for the distribution of state
foundation funding and other forms of state aid and financial assistance to
each local school district that elects to operate the public schools of the
public school district on a twelve-month basis, in order to provide the
school district with an equitable share of the state foundation funds
designated to equate a twelve-month school operation by the public school
district to the educational opportunities provided by a public school
district offering nine (9) months of public school instruction.
(2)(b) However, the A public school district shall not receive any
more state foundation funding for offering twelve (12) months of public
school instruction than it would have received for offering nine (9) months
of public school instruction.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-10-117 is repealed.
6-10-117. Four-day school week — Definition.
(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that granting
local school districts greater flexibility in scheduling instructional time
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
can reap educational benefits for the students and financial rewards for the
school district. It is the intent of this section to authorize local school
districts to initiate and maintain public school educational programs on a
four-day school-week basis, so long as planned instructional time is in
accord with requirements established by the State Board of Education.
(b) As used in this section, “four-day school week” means an
educational program in which all students attend school for four (4) days a
week but no fewer than the total number of hours required by the Standards
for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts in a five-
day school week.
(c) The board of directors of any school district is authorized to
initiate and maintain a four-day school week in any or all of the public
schools in the school district.
(d)(1) The State Board of Education shall establish appropriate
standards, guidelines, and rules for the determination of average daily
membership of school districts and for the distribution of state aid to each
local school district that elects to operate any or all of the public schools
of its school district on a four-day school-week basis, to provide the school
district with an equitable share of aid funds designated to equate a four-day
school-week operation by the school district to the educational opportunities
provided by a school district offering a five-day school week.
(2) Provided, however, that a school district shall not receive
any more state financial aid for offering a four-day school week of
instruction than it would have received for offering a five-day school week
of instruction.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-10-126 is repealed.
6-10-126. Delay or early release of school due to emergency
circumstances.
(a) A superintendent may delay the start time or release early a
school or schools in the school district due to any of the following
emergency circumstances:
(1) Inclement weather;
(2) Contagious disease outbreak; or
(3) Utility outage.
(b)(1) For no more than five (5) school days total per year, a
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
superintendent may, due to emergency circumstances under subsection (a) of
this section, either:
(A) Delay the start of the school day until as late as
10:00 a.m.; or
(B) Release students from school no earlier than 1:00 p.m.
(2) A school day that is delayed or released early under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall count as a credited school day, with
no requirement for additional days to be added to the school calendar.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-10-127 is repealed.
6-10-127. Making up missed school days.
(a) If a superintendent closes school for a regularly scheduled school
day due to exceptional or emergency circumstances such as a contagious
disease outbreak, inclement weather, or other acts of God, the superintendent
may make up missed school days by adding time to the beginning or ending of a
regular school day for a minimum of sixty (60) minutes.
(b)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education may
grant up to the equivalent of ten (10) student attendance days for public
school districts that have an alternative instruction plan approved by the
commissioner for the use of alternative methods of instruction, including
without limitation virtual learning, on days when the public school district
is closed due to exceptional or emergency circumstances such as:
(A) A contagious disease outbreak, inclement weather, or
other acts of God; or
(B) A utility outage.
(2) The public school district's alternative instruction plan
shall demonstrate how teaching and learning in the public school district
will not be negatively impacted by the use of alternative methods of
instruction under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-15-202(f)(15), concerning written
statements from school districts to the Commissioner of Elementary and
Secondary Education that confirm compliance with certain statutory
requirements, is amended to read as follows:
(15) Section 6-16-102 6-10-106 concerning school day;

04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-16-102 is repealed.
6-16-102. School day — Definition.
(a)(1)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
section, as used in this section, “school day” shall mean a day in which
classes are in session and students receive at least six (6) hours of
instructional time.
(B) However, “school day” for purposes of a public school
district that implements an alternate school calendar under § 6-10-106(g)
means a day in which classes are in session and students are under the
guidance and direction of a teacher or public school employee.
(2)(A) Any day in which less than six (6) hours of instructional
time are provided to students shall be counted as one-half (½) of a school
day if at least three (3) hours of instructional time are provided to
students.
(B) However, subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall
not apply to a public school district that implements an alternate school
calendar under § 6-10-106(g).
(3)(A) Any day in which less than three (3) hours of
instructional time are provided to students shall not be counted as any part
of a school day.
(B) However, subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section shall
not apply to a public school district that implements an alternate school
calendar under § 6-10-106(g).
(4) A school district may include as part of the school day the
travel time between public schools or other educational programs of those
students attending classes or programs authorized by law.
(5)(A) At least forty (40) minutes of instructional time per
school day shall be used for recess during the school day for students
attending public elementary schools.
(B) Recess shall:
(i) Consist of supervised, unstructured social time
during which public school students may communicate with each other;
(ii) Occur outdoors when weather and other relevant
conditions permit; and
(iii) Include without limitation opportunities for
free play and vigorous physical activity, regardless of whether recess occurs
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
indoors or outdoors.
(C) The remaining instructional hours required under this
section shall be distributed across academic content areas as determined by a
public school district's board of directors.
(D) A public school principal may use discretion to adjust
recess time required under this section due to special circumstances or
programs that interrupt a regular school day.
(E)(i) A public elementary school may seek a waiver from
the requirements under this subdivision (a)(5) if the public elementary
school:
(a) Submits to the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education for approval an alternative plan for recess that:
(1) Exceeds the required minimum amount
of minutes combined for physical activity under § 6-16-132 and recess under
this section; and
(2) Provides for both structured and
unstructured social time; or
(b) Is approved by the division to operate as
a virtual school.
(ii) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the
division shall provide to the House Committee on Education and the Senate
Committee on Education each year for three (3) years a report that details
the following:
(a) Which public elementary schools have been
granted a waiver under subdivision (a)(5)(E)(i) of this section; and
(b) How many waivers have been granted by the
division under subdivision (a)(5)(E)(i) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the State Board of
Education shall promulgate rules to prescribe the credit to be given students
for attending school for only a portion of a school day because the school is
closed due to emergency circumstances which would be hazardous to the health
of the students. The state board shall also identify the emergency
circumstances.
(c)(1) A school district is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements
of subsection (a) of this section if the planned instructional time in each
school day does not average less than six (6) hours each day or thirty (30)
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
hours each week.
(2) However, subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not apply
to a public school district that implements an alternate school calendar
under § 6-10-106(g).

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2403(c), concerning the requirements a
public school district and an open-enrollment public charter school must meet
to be eligible for funds to implement salary increases under the Teacher
Compensation Program of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(c) To be eligible for funds to implement the salary increases under
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, each public school district and
open-enrollment public charter school shall be open for on-site, in-person
instruction for at least:
(1) One hundred seventy-eight (178) days; or One hundred sixty
(160) school days or the hourly equivalent of one hundred sixty (160) school
days for a public school with an "A" school rating according to the most
recent results of the school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any
other accountability system approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education;
(2) One thousand sixty-eight (1,068) hours One hundred sixty-
four (164) school days or the hourly equivalent of one hundred sixty-four
(164) school days for a public school with a "B" school rating according to
the most recent results of the school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq.
or any other accountability system approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education;
(3) One hundred sixty-eight (168) school days or the hourly
equivalent of one hundred sixty-eight (168) school days for a public school
with a "C" school rating according to the most recent results of the school
rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other accountability system
approved by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(4) One hundred seventy-two (172) school days or the hourly
equivalent of one hundred seventy-two (172) school days for a public school
with a "D" school rating according to the most recent results of the school
rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other accountability system
approved by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(5) One hundred seventy-eight (178) school days or the hourly
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
equivalent of one hundred seventy-eight (178) for a public school with an "F"
school rating according to the most recent results of the school rating
system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. or any other accountability system approved
by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-237. Mandatory attendance — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Financial hardship" means harm or suffering caused by a
student's inability to obtain or provide basic life necessities of food,
clothing, and shelter for the student or the student's family;
(2) "Planned instructional time" means regularly scheduled class
periods offering courses or local credits approved by the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(3) "School day" means a day in which classes are in session and
students are receiving instruction.
(b)(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a student in grades
nine through twelve (9-12) shall be required to be scheduled for and attend
planned instructional time for a full school day in the public school
district or open-enrollment public charter school in which the student is
enrolled.
(2) A student may be assigned to no more than one (1) class
period each school day for a study hall or other time of self-study or
organized tutoring in which the student is required to participate and attend
in his or her public school district or open-enrollment public charter school
building.
(3) Enrollment and attendance in a vocational-educational
training course, college course, work program, internship, or another
division-approved course for credit may be used to satisfy the requirements
of this section even if the vocational-educational training course, college
course, work program, internship, or other division-approved course for
credit is not located on the student's public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school campus.
(c) A public school district board of directors or the governing body
of an open-enrollment public charter school may develop policies to allow for
04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1864
granting an exemption to a student who would experience a proven financial
hardship if he or she is required to attend a full school day.
(d) This section does not:
(1) Preclude a student who has met all graduation requirements
from graduating early; or
(2) Require a student who has graduated early from high school
to continue to attend school.
(e) The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to implement
this section.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2503(6), concerning the definition of
a "full academic year" under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “Full academic year” means at least one hundred seventy-
eight (178) the number of days of instruction or the equivalent number of
hours to what is offered in traditional public schools required for a public
school as specified by § 6-10-106;

/s/Andrews

















04-03-2025 11:11:41 TNL134